Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1058.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(a)(11)(iv) of the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law, is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 301 AND 303(A)(11)(IV) OF THE ACT OF AUGUST 26, 1971 (P.L.351, NO.91), KNOWN AS THE STATE LOTTERY LAW, ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 301. STATEMENT OF PURPOSE.THIS CHAPTER IS ENACTED TO ESTABLISH A LOTTERY TO BE OPERATED BY THE STATE, THE NET PROCEEDS OF WHICH ARE TO BE USED AFTER <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 JUNE 30, 1972, FOR THE PURPOSES OF PROVIDING PROPERTY TAX RELIEF FOR THE ELDERLY FOR TAXES PAID IN 1971 AND THEREAFTER TO PERSONS 65 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AND FOR PROVIDING CERTAIN FREE FIXED ROUTE LOCAL TRANSIT SERVICES TO PERSONS 65 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AND REDUCED FARE ON GROUP RIDE TRANSIT SERVICE TO PERSONS 65 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER. IT IS FURTHER INTENDED TO PROVIDE A MEANS THROUGH WHICH TO CURB ILLEGAL GAMBLING OPERATIONS IN PENNSYLVANIA. THE LOTTERY SHALL BE MANAGED IN SUCH A FASHION AS TO GENERATE MAXIMUM PROFITS FROM LOTTERY ACTIVITIES TO SUSTAIN OR INCREASE THE FUNDING LEVELS FOR THE PROGRAMS THAT BENEFIT COMMONWEALTH SENIORS EACH FISCAL YEAR.Section 303. Powers and duties of secretary.(a) Powers and duties enumerated.--In addition to the powers and duties provided by law and the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, the secretary shall have the power and it shall be his duty to operate and administer the lottery, and to promulgate rules and regulations governing the establishment and operation thereof, including, but not limited to:* * *(11) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among:* * *(iv) for property tax relief and free or reduced fare transit service for the elderly as provided in section 311. [The following apply:(A) For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2014, no less than 27% of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be 20250HB1058PN1728 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dedicated to this subparagraph.(B) For fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2014, and ending June 30, 2019, no less than 25% of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be dedicated to this subparagraph.(C) For fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2019, and ending June 30, 2029, no less than 20% of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be dedicated to this subparagraph.(D) For fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2029, no less than 25% of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be dedicated to this subparagraph.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1058PN1728 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617